Utah statutes.
72-11-107.   Payment of interest and principal of revenue bonds -- Agreements authorized.

The committee may provide by resolution at a duly called regular or special meeting for the payment of the interest and principal of any and all revenue bonds as may be issued from time to time, and for that purpose may enter into agreements with other parties and may execute documents in a form and substance and on terms and conditions as it, with the approval of the director of the Division of Finance, may from time to time determine.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

